Hawaii statutes.
§321-225 The state emergency medical
services advisory committee. (a) There is established within the
department of health for administrative purposes only the state emergency
medical services advisory committee, which shall sit in an advisory capacity to
the department of health on all matters relating to the state system. The
advisory committee may advise the department of health upon request of the
department or upon its own initiative with regard to the state system. The
advisory committee shall:

(1) Monitor, review, and evaluate on an ongoing basis
the operations, administration, and efficacy of the state system, or any
components thereof, to determine conformity with and maximum implementation of
this part.

(2) Prepare and submit periodic assessments, reports,
and other documents relating to the state system to ensure the implementation
of this part, as deemed necessary or desirable in the discretion of the
advisory committee.

(3) Seek the input of the public in relation to the
state system to ensure adequate fulfillment of the emergency medical services
needs of the State consistent with this part.

(4) Participate in any planning or other policymaking
with regard to the state system, and seek the participation of the public,
including subarea health planning councils in its consideration of plans and
policies relating to the state system.

(5) Perform other functions, and have other duties
necessary to ensuring the fullest implementation and maintenance of the state
system.

(6) Advise the department of health in formulating a
master plan for emergency medical services, including medicom, the
"911" system, and other components necessary to meet the emergency
medical needs of the people of the State which shall be submitted to the legislature.

(b) The advisory committee shall be composed
of twenty members: three nonvoting ex-officio members, who shall be the
director of transportation, the adjutant general, and the administrator of the
state health planning and development agency, or the designated representatives
thereof, and seventeen members representing all counties of the State who shall
be appointed by the governor subject to section 26-34 as follows:

(1) Five members who shall be physicians experienced
in the conduct and delivery of emergency medical services; provided that at
least two shall be engaged in the practice of emergency medicine and be
board-eligible or board-certified by the American Board of Emergency Medicine,
and provided further that at least one physician shall be engaged in the
practice of pediatrics and be board-eligible or board-certified by the American
Board of Pediatrics;

(2) Four members who shall be consumers of health
care and who shall have no connection with or relationship to the health care
system of the State and who shall be representative of all counties;

(3) Four members of allied health professions related
to emergency medical services; and

(4) Four members, one from each county, who shall be
mobile intensive care technicians or emergency medical technicians engaged in
the practice of pre-hospital emergency medical service.

The members of the advisory committee shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred
in the performance of their duties, including travel expenses. The chairperson
of the advisory committee shall be elected by the members from among their
numbers. A majority of the members of the advisory committee shall constitute
a quorum for the conduct of business of the advisory committee. A majority vote
of the members present at a meeting at which a quorum is established shall be
necessary to validate any action of the committee.

(c) The advisory committee may adopt rules for
its governance.

(d) The department of health shall provide
necessary staff and other support required by the advisory committee for the
performance of its duties. [L 1978, c 148, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 93, §3; am L
1991, c 115, §2; am L 1994, c 242, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next